test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-Clex_siiskis_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - siiskiš: # MLO, ok
    siiskiš+N+Sg+Nom: siiskiš
    siiskiš+N+Sg+Gen: siskii
    siiskiš+N+Sg+Acc: siskii
    siiskiš+N+Sg+Ill: siskiižân
    siiskiš+N+Sg+Loc: siskiist
    siiskiš+N+Sg+Com: siskijn
    siiskiš+N+Sg+Abe: siskiittáá
    siiskiš+N+Ess: siˊskižin
    siiskiš+N+Par: siˊskižid
    siiskiš+N+Pl+Nom: siskiih
    siiskiš+N+Pl+Gen: siskij
    siiskiš+N+Pl+Acc: siskijd
    siiskiš+N+Pl+Ill: siskijd
    siiskiš+N+Pl+Loc: siskijn
    siiskiš+N+Pl+Com: siskijguin
    siiskiš+N+Pl+Abe: siskijttáá
